Wyoming, session 2026, HB0038.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-7-356(d) is amended to read:

35-7-356. Registration.

(d) Every registrant of a pesticide or device shall
pay an annual registration fee of one hundred forty dollars
($140.00) two hundred ten dollars ($210.00) for each
product registered. All registrations shall expire on
HB0038

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0273
December 31 of each year, following the date of the
registration, and may thereupon be renewed for successive
periods of twelve (12) months upon payment of the proper
fee. One hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) One hundred
ninety-five dollars ($195.00) of the fee collected pursuant
to this subsection shall be deposited in the special
natural resource account in the department of agriculture
which is hereby created. Funds in the special natural
resource account are continuously appropriated to the
department and shall only be used to provide funding for
the pesticide registration fee program. Fifteen dollars
($15.00) of the fee collected pursuant to this subsection
shall be deposited in the pesticide education account in
the department of agriculture which is hereby created.
Funds in the pesticide education account are continuously
appropriated to the department and shall only be used to
provide funding for the pesticide applicator certification
program provided by the University of Wyoming.

Section 2. This act shall apply to each product
initially registered or renewed on or after July 1, 2026.

HB0038

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0273
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0038